src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_KÖÖ
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 18 ö
!!€  köö: köö+N+Sg+Nom pool/billiard stick
!!€  köötä: köö+N+Sg+Par
!!€  kööhön: köö+N+Sg+Ill
0:ö  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ö  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ö  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ö  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:ö  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

!! ### Opening diphthong stems
!!  In old opening diphthong final words, the dipthong simplifies for plural
!!  forms by dropping the initial vowel. For new words of this class, no
!!  stem mutations happen and they are in above mentioned classes, (e.g.
!!  NOUN_ZOMBIE).

LEXICON NOUN_TIE
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 19 ie
!!€  tie: tie+N+Sg+Nom # road
!!€  tietä: tie+N+Sg+Par
!!€  teitä: tie+N+Pl+Par
0:ie  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ie  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ie  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ie  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ie  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:ie  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VUO
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 19 uo
!!€  suo: suo+N+Sg+Nom # swamp
!!€  suota: suo+N+Sg+Par
!!€  soita: suo+N+Pl+Par
0:uo  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:uo  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:uo  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:uo  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:uo  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:uo  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
0:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_TYÖ
!! THIS WAS MISSING 2015-08-23, REDIRECTING Jaska
 NOUN_YÖ ;
LEXICON NOUN_YÖ
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 19 yö
!!€  työ: työ+N+Sg+Nom # work
!!€  työtä: työ+N+Sg+Par
!!€  töitä: työ+N+Pl+Par
0:yö  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:yö  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:ö  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:yö  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:yö  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN  ;
0:ö  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ö  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ö  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ö  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:yö  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:yö  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ö  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
0:ö  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

!! ### Newer loan words
!!  The loan words that end in long vowel, and have been modified to Finnish
!!  orthography, have combination of long vowel stem’s allomorphs for e.g
!!  illatives. Sometimes rules for these classes of words are vague.

LEXICON NOUN_NUGAA
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 20 a
!!€  nugaa: nugaa+N+Sg+Nom # nougat
!!€  nugaata: nugaa+N+Sg+Par
!!€  nugaana: nugaa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  nugaahan: nugaa+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  nugaaseen: nugaa+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  nugaissa: nugaa+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  nugaista: nugaa+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  nugaiden: nugaa+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  nugaitten: nugaa+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  nugaisiin: nugaa+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  nugaihin: nugaa+N+Pl+Ill
0:a  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:a  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN  ;
0:a  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_PATEE
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 20 e
!!€  patee: patee+N+Sg+Nom # paté
!!€  pateeta: patee+N+Sg+Par
!!€  pateena: patee+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  pateehen: patee+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  pateeseen: patee+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  pateissa: patee+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  pateista: patee+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  pateiden: patee+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  pateitten: patee+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  pateisiin: patee+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  pateihin: patee+N+Pl+Ill
0:e  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_BIDEE
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 20 e front
!!€  bidee: bidee+N+Sg+Nom # bidet
!!€  bideetä: bidee+N+Sg+Par
!!€  bideenä: bidee+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  bideehen: bidee+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  bideeseen: bidee+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  bideissä: bidee+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  bideistä: bidee+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  bideiden: bidee+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  bideitten: bidee+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  bideisiin: bidee+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  bideihin: bidee+N+Pl+Ill
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

!!  There’s a gap in -ii final loan stems.

LEXICON NOUN_TRIKOO
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 20 o
!!€  trikoo: trikoo+N+Sg+Nom # tights
!!€  trikoota: trikoo+N+Sg+Par
!!€  trikoona: trikoo+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  trikoissa: trikoo+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  trikoista: trikoo+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  trikooseen: trikoo+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  trikoiden: trikoo+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  trikoitten: trikoo+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  trikoihin: trikoo+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  trikoisiin: trikoo+N+Pl+Ill
0:o  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIN  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_RAGUU
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 20 u
!!€  raguu: raguu+N+Sg+Nom # ragout
!!€  raguuta: raguu+N+Sg+Par
!!€  raguuna: raguu+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  raguussa: raguu+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  raguista: raguu+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  raguuseen: raguu+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  raguiden: raguu+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  raguiden: raguu+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  raguisiin: raguu+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  raguihin: raguu+N+Pl+Ill
0:u  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:u  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:u  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:u  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN  ;
0:u  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:u  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:u  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_FONDYY
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 20 y
!!€  fondyy: fondyy+N+Sg+Nom # fondue
!!€  fondyytä: fondyy+N+Sg+Par
!!€  fondyynä: fondyy+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  fondyyssä: fondyy+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  fondyistä: fondyy+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  fonduuseen: fondyy+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  fondyyhyn: fondyy+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  fondyiden: fondyy+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  fondyitten: fondyy+N+Pl+Gen
0:y  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:y  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:y  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:y  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN  ;
0:y  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:y  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:y  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
