src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3_letter
jöö+N+CmpNP/None:jö  NOUN_KÖÖ  ;
köö+N+CmpNP/None:kö  NOUN_KÖÖ  ;
vuo+N+CmpNP/None:v  NOUN_VUO  ;
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
aapasuo+N:aapas  NOUN_VUO  ;
asvalttitie+N:asvalttit  NOUN_TIE  ;
ateljee+N:atelje  NOUN_PATEE  ;
basaa+N:basa  NOUN_NUGAA  ;
buklee+N:bukle  NOUN_PATEE  ;
cree+N:cre  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
dekoltee+N:dekolte  NOUN_PATEE  ;
diakoniatyö+N:diakonia#t NOUN_TYÖ ;
eduskuntatyö+N:edus#kunta#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
essee+N:esse  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
fondyy+N:fondy  NOUN_FONDYY  ;
frotee+N:frote  NOUN_PATEE  ;
hääyö+N:hää  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
häntävyö+N:häntäv  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
häränfilee+N:härän#file  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
harjoitustyö+N:harjoitus#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
hillasuo+N:hilla#s NOUN_VUO ;
hilsesampoo+N:hilse#sampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
huonekalupuusepäntyö+N:huonekalupuusepänt  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
iltatyö+N:ilta#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
jakelutie+N:jakelut  NOUN_TIE  ;
jamboree+N:jambore  NOUN_PATEE  ;
joustofrotee+N:joustofrote  NOUN_PATEE  ;
juustofondyy+N:juusto#fondy  NOUN_FONDYY  ;
juustofondyy+N:juustofondy  NOUN_FONDYY  ;
kahvee+N:kahve  NOUN_PATEE  ;
kaiverrustyö+N:kaiverrust  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
kaksoisvee+N:kaksois#ve  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
kalafilee+N:kala#file  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
kalatie+N:kalat  NOUN_TIE  ;
karpalosuo+N:karpalos  NOUN_VUO  ;
kärrytie+N:kärryt  NOUN_TIE  ;
käsityö+N:käsi#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
kehätie+N:kehät  NOUN_TIE  ;
keidassuo+N:keidass  NOUN_VUO  ;
kenttätyö+N:kenttät  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
kermatoffee+N:kerma#toffe  NOUN_PATEE  ;
kinkkufilee+N:kinkku#file  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
kirvesmiehentyö+N:kirvesmiehen#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
klisee+N:klise  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
kohosuo+N:kohos  NOUN_VUO  ;
kohtalontie+N:kohtalont  NOUN_TIE  ;
komentovyö+N:komentov  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
korpisuo+N:korpis  NOUN_VUO  ;
kotityö+N:koti#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
kuivasampoo+N:kuiva#sampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
kultadublee+N:kultaduble  NOUN_PATEE  ;
kumpusuo+N:kumpus  NOUN_VUO  ;
kutsumustyö+N:kutsumust  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
kyynelvuo+N:kyynelv  NOUN_VUO  ;
lääkesampoo+N:lääke#sampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
lallalaa+N:lallala  NOUN_NUGAA  ;
laudaturtyö+N:laudatur#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
lempityö+N:lempit  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
lettosuo+N:letto#s NOUN_VUO ;
lihafondyy+N:liha#fondy  NOUN_FONDYY  ;
lihafondyy+N:lihafondy  NOUN_FONDYY  ;
liittymätie+N:liittymä#t  NOUN_TIE  ;
maanpuolustustyö+N:maan#puolustus#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
maatyö+N:maat  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
magneettivuo+N:magneettiv  NOUN_VUO  ;
maksapatee+N:maksa#pate  NOUN_PATEE  ;
menominee+N:menomine  NOUN_PATEE  ;
menyy+N:meny  NOUN_FONDYY  ;
munasampoo+N:muna#sampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
museorautatie+N:museo#rauta#t  NOUN_TIE  ;
muuraustyö+N:muuraus#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
myyräntyö+N:myyränt  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
nailontrikoo+N:nailon#triko  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
neutronivuo+N:neutroniv  NOUN_VUO  ;
nugaa+N:nuga  NOUN_NUGAA  ;
öljysampoo+N:öljy#sampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
opintie+N:opin#t  NOUN_TIE  ;
osapäivätyö+N:osapäivät  NOUN_YÖ  ;
paahtofilee+N:paahto#file  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
palsasuo+N:palsas  NOUN_VUO  ;
patee+N:pate  NOUN_PATEE  ;
patruunavyö+N:patruuna#v  NOUN_YÖ  ;
peltotyö+N:peltot  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
perääntymistie+N:perääntymis#t  NOUN_TIE  ;
pikee+N:pike  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
platoo+N:plato  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
porsaanfilee+N:porsaanfile  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
pumpulitrikoo+N:pumpuli#triko  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
purkautumistie+N:purkautumist  NOUN_TIE  ;
purkutyö+N:purku#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
puuvillatrikoo+N:puu#villa#triko  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
raguu+N:ragu  NOUN_RAGUU  ;
rahkasuo+N:rahka#s  NOUN_VUO  ;
referee+N:refere  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
revyy+N:revy  NOUN_FONDYY  ;
rimpisuo+N:rimpi#s  NOUN_VUO  ;
ryhmätyö+N:ryhmät  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
sampoo+N:sampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
santee+N:sante  NOUN_PATEE  ;
sävytesampoo+N:sävyte#sampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
sepelitie+N:sepeli#t  NOUN_TIE  ;
shampoo+N:shampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
silakkafilee+N:silakkafile  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
sillifilee+N:sillifile  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
sisäfilee+N:sisäfile  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
sivutyö+N:sivu#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
sopimustie+N:sopimus#t  NOUN_TIE  ;
suflee+N:sufle  NOUN_PATEE  ;
surmatyö+N:surmat  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
tehdastyö+N:tehdas#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
toimistotyö+N:toimistot  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
trokee+N:troke  NOUN_PATEE  ;
tullitie+N:tulli#t  NOUN_TIE  ;
ulkofilee+N:ulko#file  NOUN_BIDEE  ;
uranuurtajantyö+N:uran#uurtajan#t  NOUN_YÖ  ;
vammaistyö+N:vammaist  NOUN_TYÖ  ;
vauvasampoo+N:vauva#sampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
vesitie+N:vesi#t  NOUN_TIE  ;
villatrikoo+N:villa#triko  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
voilee+N:voile  NOUN_PATEE  ;
yksityistie+N:yksityist  NOUN_TIE  ;
yrttisampoo+N:yrttisampo  NOUN_TRIKOO  ;
pätkätyö+N:pätkä#t NOUN_YÖ ; ! nouns.lexc NOUN
hillasuo+N:hilla#s NOUN_VUO ; ! nouns.lexc NOUN
lankavyö+N:lanka#v NOUN_TYÖ ; ! nouns.lexc NOUN
